Washington statutes.
RCW 21.20.275

Pending registration—Notice of termination—Application for continuation.

The director may in his or her discretion send notice to the applicant in any pending registration in which no action has been taken for nine months immediately prior to the sending of such notice, advising such applicant that the pending registration will be terminated thirty days from the date of sending unless on or before the termination date the applicant makes application in writing to the director showing good cause why it should be continued as a pending registration. If such application is not made or good cause shown, the director shall terminate the pending registration.

[ 2016 c 61 s 6; 1994 c 256 s 17; 1979 ex.s. c 68 s 16; 1974 ex.s. c 77 s 12.]

NOTES:

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.

Effective date—1974 ex.s. c 77: See note following RCW 21.20.040.